Massachusetts, session 194th, H414.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 138 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting in section
1 the following definition:-
“Outdoor table service”, restaurant service that includes food prepared on-site and under
a food establishment permit issued by a municipal authority pursuant to 105 CMR 590.00 that is
served to seated diners outside the restaurant building envelope, whether on a sidewalk, patio,
deck, lawn, parking area or other outdoor space.
SECTION 2. Chapter 138 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after Section 12C, the following section:-
Section 12D. A local licensing authority may grant approval for a change in the
description of the licensed premises for the purpose of permitting outdoor alcohol service, as the
local licensing authority deems reasonable and proper, and issue an amended license to existing
license holders, without further review or approval from the commission prior to issuance. Upon
of 2

approval of an amended license, the local licensing authority shall provide notice of the amended
license to the commission. Nothing in this section shall prevent the commission from exercising
the commission’s enforcement authority over an amended license.
SECTION 3. Section 3B of Chapter 40A of the General Laws of 2024 is hereby repealed.
of 2